Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-4009
Information not confidential; limit on disclosure.

(1) Information obtained under
the Sex Offender Registration Act shall not be
confidential, except that the following information shall only
be disclosed to law enforcement agencies, including federal or state probation
or parole agencies, if appropriate:

(a) A sex
offender's social security number;

(b) Any references to arrests of a sex
offender that did not result in conviction;

(c) A sex offender's travel or immigration
document information;

(d) A sex offender's remote communication device identifiers and
addresses;

(e) A sex offender's email addresses, instant messaging identifiers,
chat room identifiers, global unique identifiers, and other Internet communication
identifiers;

(f) A sex offender's telephone numbers;

(g) A sex offender's
motor vehicle operator's license information or state identification card
number; and

(h) The name of any employer of a sex offender.

(2) The identity of any victim
of a sex offense shall not be released.

(3) The
release of information authorized by this section shall conform with the rules
and regulations adopted and promulgated by the Nebraska State Patrol pursuant
to section 29-4013.

Laws 1996, LB 645, § 9;

Laws 1998, LB 204, § 2;

Laws 2002, LB 564, § 8;

Laws 2005, LB 713, § 6;

Laws 2006, LB 1199, § 23;

Laws 2009, LB285, § 9.